District of Columbia statutes.
1-610.02

Repealed

Incumbents.

Repealed.

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 1002, 25 DCR 5740
Apr. 12, 1997, D.C. Law 11-259, § 304, 44 DCR 1423
Apr. 12, 2000. D.C. Law 13-91, § 158(b), 47 DCR 520
1981 Ed., § 1-611.2.
1973 Ed., § 1-340.2.